Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1936.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6335(a) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 6335. Release or holding of hearing.(a) [General rule] Scheduling of hearing.--After the petition has been filed alleging the child to be dependent or delinquent, the court shall fix a time for hearing thereon, which, if the child is in detention or shelter care shall not be later than ten days after the filing of the petition. Except as provided in subsection (f), if the hearing is not held within such time, the child shall be immediately released from <--123456789101112131415161718 detention or shelter care.(a.1) Additional time in shelter care .-- A child may be detained or kept in shelter care, after the period specified under subsection (a), for an additional single period not to exceed ten days where:(1) the court determines at a hearing that:(i) evidence material to the case is unavailable;(ii) due diligence to obtain such evidence has been exercised; and(iii) there are reasonable grounds to believe that such evidence will be available at a later date; [and](2) the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that:(i) the life of the child would be in danger;(ii) the community would be exposed to a specific danger; or(iii) the child will abscond or be removed from the jurisdiction of the court[.]; and(3) the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that:(i) no condition or combination of release conditions or community-based alternatives to detention provide a reasonable assurance of public safety; and(ii) the harm caused to the child by the cumulative secure detention, SHELTER CARE, separation from the child's home, school and community is substantially outweighed by the need to maintain the child in secure detention OR SHELTER CARE . When determining the harm caused to the child, the court shall also consider the heightened harm of cumulative secure detention OR SHELTER 20250HB1936PN2861 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 CARE time and the resulting extended separation from the child's home, school and community on the child's well-being.(a.2) Summons.--(1) The court shall direct the issuance of a summons to the parents, guardian, or other custodian, a guardian ad litem, and any other persons as appear to the court to be proper or necessary parties to the proceeding, requiring them to appear before the court at the time fixed to answer the allegations of the petition.(2) The summons shall also be directed to the child if [he] the child is 14 or more years of age or is alleged to be a delinquent.(3) A copy of the petition shall accompany the summons.* * *(g) Consideration of cumulative secure detention time.--The court shall take into consideration the cumulative secure detention time when determining the duration of detention and the best interests of the child, including reducing the harm caused to the child by separation from home, school and community.(h) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Cumulative secure detention time." The total length of stay of a child in secure detention both prior to and after adjudication.Section 2. Section 6352 of Title 42 is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 6352. Disposition of delinquent child.20250HB1936PN2861 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(B.1) CONSIDERATION OF DETENTION TIME.--IF THE COURT ISSUES AN ORDER COMMITTING A CHILD TO A FACILITY DESIGNED OR OPERATED FOR THE BENEFIT OF DELINQUENT CHILDREN FOR A PERIOD OF 18 MONTHS OR MORE, THE COURT SHALL TAKE INTO CONSIDERATION THE CHILD'S LENGTH OF DETENTION WHEN DETERMINING THE DURATION OF THE DISPOSITION AND THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE CHILD, INCLUDING REDUCING THE HARM CAUSED TO THE CHILD BY SEPARATION FROM HOME, SCHOOL AND COMMUNITY.* * *(c.1) Transfer.--A child committed to an institution or other A facility designed or operated for the benefit of delinquent children shall be transferred to the ordered placement no more than seven 20 business days after the court orders the commitment , UNLESS INDIVIDUALIZED CIRCUMSTANCES NECESSITATE A DELAY IN PLACEMENT . (c.2) Release pending transfer.--(1) If the child is not transferred to the court-ordered placement within seven business days of commitment THE TIME PERIOD UNDER SUBSECTION (C.1) , the court shall MAY hold a review hearing no more than 10 days after the placement order was entered to determine the child's continued detention status.(2) At the review hearing under paragraph (1), the court shall MAY order the child's release pending the availability of a secure placement unless:(i) the child has already been transferred to placement; or(ii) the court finds by clear and convincing evidence, and states its findings on the record, that:20250HB1936PN2861 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (A) the child's transfer is impractical, including a bed not being available for the child and the existence or likelihood of a State emergency or disaster or any other condition that may interfere with the child's transfer; and(B) the child's release presents a risk of harm to a specific individual and the risk cannot be mitigated through community-based alternatives or conditions of release.(3) At the review hearing under paragraph (1), the court may impose nonfinancial conditions of release, including electronic monitoring, curfew or participation in community-based alternatives, if the court determines the conditions are necessary to mitigate imminent and serious risk of harm to a specific individual and provide a reasonable assurance of the child's attendance at future court dates.(4) If, following the review hearing mandated under paragraph (1), a child remains detained in secure detention pending transfer, the court shall reduce the court-ordered specified length of time committed to the placement by each day that passes between the transfer review hearing under paragraph (1) and the child's transfer placement.(5) A child detained pending transfer shall be entitled to the review hearing under paragraph (1) every 10 days until the child is transferred to placement.(6) If the court makes three consecutive findings of detention under paragraphs (1) and (2) and no transfer has occurred, the child shall be released with community-based alternatives to detention pending availability of placement, unless the court determines the child poses an imminent risk 20250HB1936PN2861 - 5 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of bodily injury to a specific individual and the risk cannot be mitigated through community-based alternatives or conditions of release. The court shall make an individualized finding in writing and on the record.(7) (4) A child who was released pending availability of placement shall MAY return to court to be committed when the placement is available AS DIRECTED BY THE COURT . * * *Section 3. Section 6353(a.1)(2) of Title 42, added October 16, 2024 (P.L.1003, No.107), is amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 6353. Limitation on and change in place of commitment and disposition review hearing.* * *(a.1) Disposition review hearings.--* * *(2) At a disposition review hearing under paragraph (1), the court shall, at a minimum, determine:(i) whether the child is receiving the necessary services or treatment contemplated by the court's disposition;(i.1) the child's education needs and the child's access to appropriate educational services, including whether the child's education program meets the required standards and whether the child is making progress toward high school graduation;(i.2) whether the placement recommends the child be placed in a less restrictive environment;(ii) whether the child continues to pose a threat to the community which cannot be mitigated by available 20250HB1936PN2861 - 6 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 community-based services;(iii) whether additional services or treatment are needed and whether the services or treatment are available in a less restrictive setting;(iv) whether the child should continue in placement or be released from placement under aftercare supervision; [and](iv.1) if released from placement under aftercare supervision, whether the least restrictive conditions of supervision necessary are used to provide assurance of public safety; and(v) the date of the next disposition review hearing.* * *(4) The following apply to p resumption of release: (i) If the court finds that the child has completed the services available in the placement or the placement recommends the release of the child, there shall be a presumption in favor of the child's release unless the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that:(A) the child's release poses a significant risk to public safety that cannot be mitigated by available community-based services or conditions of release;(B) t he child requires further services or treatment that are available at the placement and not available in a less restrictive setting; and(C) the harm inflicted on the child by continued placement is outweighed by the need for the child's continued placement.(ii) In considering the harm inflicted on the child 20250HB1936PN2861 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by continued placement, the court shall consider:(A) the entire length of time the child has been separated from the home, school and community, including the number of days detained in a secure detention facility pending adjudication and transfer to the placement; and(B) any educational disruption, the child's educational needs and access to services, including the child's need for specialized services, such as special education or language instruction, and the child's progress toward graduation during that time.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1936PN2861 - 8 - <--12345678910111213